Florida, session 2026, SB364.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 38 39 Section 1.âSection 473.301, Florida Statutes, is amended to 40 read: 41 473.301âPurpose.âThe Legislature recognizes that there is a 42 public need for independent and objective certified public 43 accountants and that it is necessary to regulate the practice of 44 public accounting to assure the minimum competence of 45 practitioners and the accuracy of audit statements upon which 46 the public relies and to protect the public from dishonest 47 practitioners and, therefore, deems it necessary in the interest 48 of public welfare to regulate the practice of public accountancy 49 in this state. 50 Section 2.âSubsection (9) of section 473.302, Florida 51 Statutes, is amended to read: 52 473.302âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 53 (9)ââUniform Accountancy Actâ means the Uniform Accountancy 54 Act, Eighth Edition, dated January 2018 and published by the 55 American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and the 56 National Association of State Boards of Accountancy. 57 58 However, these terms shall not include services provided by the 59 American Institute of Certified Public Accountants or the 60 Florida Institute of Certified Public Accountants, or any full 61 service association of certified public accounting firms whose 62 plans of administration have been approved by the board, to 63 their members or services performed by these entities in 64 reviewing the services provided to the public by members of 65 these entities. 66 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 473.3035, Florida 67 Statutes, is amended to read: 68 473.3035âDivision of Certified Public Accounting.â 69 (1)âAll services concerning this chapter, including, but 70 not limited to, recordkeeping services, examination services, 71 legal services, and investigative services, and those services 72 in chapter 455 necessary to perform the duties of this chapter 73 are shall be provided by the Division of Certified Public 74 Accounting. The board may, by majority vote, delegate a duty or 75 duties to the appropriate division within the department or 76 competitively procure contracted services pursuant to part I of 77 chapter 287 for the performance of such duties, except for 78 investigative services. All such contracted services must be 79 fulfilled by corporations organized under chapter 617. The board 80 may, by majority vote, rescind any such delegation of duties or 81 contracted services at any time. 82 Section 4.âSubsection (3) of section 473.306, Florida 83 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) of that section is 84 republished, to read: 85 473.306âExaminations.â 86 (3)âAn applicant is entitled to take the licensure 87 examination to practice in this state as a certified public 88 accountant if: 89 (a)âThe applicant has completed 120 semester hours or 180 90 quarter hours from an accredited college or university with a 91 concentration in accounting and business courses as prescribed 92 specified by the board by rule; and 93 (b)âThe applicant shows that she or he has good moral 94 character. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âgood moral 95 characterâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 473.308(6)(a) 96 s. 473.308(7)(a). The board may refuse to allow an applicant to 97 take the licensure examination for failure to satisfy this 98 requirement if: 99 1.âThe board finds a reasonable relationship between the 100 lack of good moral character of the applicant and the 101 professional responsibilities of a certified public accountant; 102 and 103 2.âThe finding by the board of lack of good moral character 104 is supported by competent substantial evidence. 105 106 If an applicant is found pursuant to this paragraph to be 107 unqualified to take the licensure examination because of a lack 108 of good moral character, the board must shall furnish to the 109 applicant a statement containing the findings of the board, a 110 complete record of the evidence upon which the determination was 111 based, and a notice of the rights of the applicant to a 112 rehearing and appeal. 113 (4)âThe board shall have the authority to establish the 114 standards for determining and shall determine: 115 (a)âWhat constitutes a passing grade for each subject or 116 part of the licensure examination; 117 (b)âWhich educational institutions, in addition to the 118 universities in the State University System of Florida, shall be 119 deemed to be accredited colleges or universities; 120 (c)âWhat courses and number of hours constitute a major in 121 accounting; and 122 (d)âWhat courses and number of hours constitute additional 123 accounting courses acceptable under s. 473.308(4). 124 Section 5.âSubsections (4) through (10) of section 473.308, 125 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 126 473.308âLicensure.â 127 (4)(a)âAn applicant for licensure must meet at least one of 128 the following requirements: 129 1.âComplete have at least 150 semester hours of college 130 education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred 131 by an accredited college or university, with a concentration in 132 accounting and business as prescribed in the total educational 133 program to the extent specified by the board. 134 2.âHold a masterâs degree in accounting or finance 135 conferred by an accredited college or university with a 136 concentration in accounting and business as prescribed by the 137 board. 138 3.âHold a baccalaureate degree in accounting or finance 139 conferred by an accredited college or university with a 140 concentration in accounting and business as prescribed by the 141 board. 142 4.âHold a baccalaureate degree in any major course of study 143 conferred by an accredited college or university and have 144 completed coursework required for a concentration in accounting 145 and business as prescribed by the board. 146 (b)âThe board shall prescribe the coursework required for a 147 concentration in accounting and business. The board may deem an 148 applicant to have satisfied requirements for such coursework if 149 the applicant receives a baccalaureate or higher degree in 150 accounting or finance conferred by an accredited college or 151 university in a state or territory of the United States. An 152 applicant receiving a baccalaureate or higher degree with a 153 major course of study other than accounting or finance must 154 complete the coursework required for a concentration in 155 accounting and business as prescribed by the board. 156 (5)(a)âAn applicant for licensure who completes the 157 education requirements under subparagraph (4)(a)1. or 158 subparagraph (4)(a)2. after December 31, 2008, must show that he 159 or she has had 1 year of work experience. An applicant who 160 completes the education requirements under subparagraph (4)(a)3. 161 or subparagraph (4)(a)4. must show 2 years of work experience. 162 (b)âSuch work This experience includes shall include 163 providing any type of service or advice involving the use of 164 accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial 165 advisory, tax, or consulting skills, all of which must be 166 verified by a certified public accountant who is licensed by a 167 state or territory of the United States. This experience is 168 acceptable if it was gained through employment in government, 169 industry, academia, or public practice; constituted a 170 substantial part of the applicantâs duties; and was verified by 171 a certified public accountant licensed by a state or territory 172 of the United States. The board shall adopt rules specifying 173 standards and providing for the review and approval of the work 174 experience required by this subsection section. 175 (b)âHowever, an applicant who completed the requirements of 176 subsection (4) on or before December 31, 2008, and who passes 177 the licensure examination on or before June 30, 2010, is exempt 178 from the requirements of this subsection. 179 (6)(a)âAn applicant for licensure must shall show that he 180 or she the applicant has good moral character. For purposes of 181 this paragraph, the term: 182 (7)(a)ââgood moral characterâ means a personal history of 183 honesty, fairness, and respect for the rights of others and for 184 the laws of this state and nation. 185 (b)âThe board may refuse to certify an applicant for 186 failure to satisfy this requirement if: 187 1.âThe board finds a reasonable relationship between the 188 lack of good moral character of the applicant and the 189 professional responsibilities of a certified public accountant; 190 and 191 2.âThe finding by the board of lack of good moral character 192 is supported by competent substantial evidence. 193 (c)âWhen an applicant is found to be unqualified for a 194 license because of a lack of good moral character, the board 195 shall furnish to the applicant a statement containing the 196 findings of the board, a complete record of the evidence upon 197 which the determination was based, and a notice of the rights of 198 the applicant to a rehearing and appeal. 199 (7)(8)âThe board shall certify as qualified for a license 200 by endorsement an applicant who: 201 (a)âIs not licensed and has not been licensed in any state 202 or territory and who has met the requirements of this section 203 for education, work experience, and good moral character and has 204 passed a national, regional, state, or territorial licensing 205 examination that is substantially equivalent to the examination 206 required by s. 473.306; or 207 (b)1.âholds an active a valid license in good standing to 208 practice public accounting issued by another state or a 209 territory of the United States, if the applicant has maintained 210 good moral character and, at the time of licensure by such other 211 state or territory, the applicant was required to show evidence 212 of having obtained at least a baccalaureate degree from an 213 accredited college or university and having passed the Uniform 214 CPA Examination criteria for issuance of such license were 215 substantially equivalent to the licensure criteria that existed 216 in this state at the time the license was issued; 217 2.âHolds a valid license to practice public accounting 218 issued by another state or territory of the United States but 219 the criteria for issuance of such license did not meet the 220 requirements of subparagraph 1.; has met the requirements of 221 this section for education, work experience, and good moral 222 character; and has passed a national, regional, state, or 223 territorial licensing examination that is substantially 224 equivalent to the examination required by s. 473.306; or 225 3.âHolds a valid license to practice public accounting 226 issued by another state or territory of the United States for at 227 least 10 years before the date of application; has passed a 228 national, regional, state, or territorial licensing examination 229 that is substantially equivalent to the examination required by 230 s. 473.306; and has met the requirements of this section for 231 good moral character. 232 (8)(9)âAn international applicant who seeks licensure as a 233 certified public accountant in this state must meet at least one 234 of the following requirements: 235 (a)âHold an active license in good standing to If the 236 applicant has at least 5 years of experience in the practice of 237 public accountancy in the United States or in the practice of 238 public accountancy or its equivalent in a foreign country that 239 the International Qualifications Appraisal Board of the National 240 Association of State Boards of Accountancy has determined has 241 licensure standards that are substantially equivalent to those 242 in the United States, or has at least 5 years of work experience 243 that meets the requirements of subsection (5), the board must 244 waive the requirements of subsection (4) which are in excess of 245 a baccalaureate degree. All experience that is used as a basis 246 for waiving the requirements of subsection (4) must be while 247 licensed as a certified public accountant by another state or 248 territory of the United States or while licensed in the practice 249 of public accounting, accountancy or its equivalent, in a 250 foreign country that the International Qualifications Appraisal 251 Board of the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy 252 has determined has licensure standards equal that are 253 substantially equivalent to those in the United States, and the 254 international applicant has passed an exam pursuant to s. 255 473.306(5). 256 (b)âHold an active license in good standing to practice 257 public accounting, or its equivalent, in a foreign country that 258 the International Qualifications Appraisal Board of the National 259 Association of State Boards of Accountancy has not determined 260 has licensure standards equal to those in the United States, and 261 the international applicant has met the requirements for 262 education, work experience, and good moral character under 263 subsections (4), (5), and (6) and has passed the Uniform CPA 264 Examination. The board shall have the authority to establish the 265 standards for experience that meet this requirement. 266 (9)(10)âThe board may refuse to certify for licensure any 267 applicant who is under investigation in another state for any 268 act that would constitute a violation of this act or chapter 269 455, until such time as the investigation is complete and 270 disciplinary proceedings are have been terminated. 271 Section 6.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 272 473.312, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 273 473.312âContinuing education.â 274 (1) 275 (c)âAt least Not less than 5 percent of the total hours 276 required by the board must shall be in ethics applicable to the 277 practice of public accounting. This requirement shall be 278 administered by providers approved by the board, and a majority 279 of the hours must shall include a review of the provisions of 280 chapter 455 and this chapter, chapter 455, and the related 281 administrative rules. Such requirement must be administered by 282 reputable providers approved by the board. The board shall give 283 preference to corporations not for profit organized under 284 chapter 617 which are exempt from taxation under s. 501(c)(6) of 285 the Internal Revenue Code and which demonstrate their 286 experience, integrity, knowledge, practice, professional 287 responsibility, and representation of the largest numbers of 288 certified public accountants in this state. 289 Section 7.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 473.3141, 290 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 291 473.3141âCertified public accountants licensed in other 292 states.â 293 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in this chapter, An 294 individual who holds an active license in good standing to 295 practice public accounting in another state or a territory of 296 the United States and who does not have an office in this state 297 has the privileges of Florida certified public accountants and 298 may provide public accounting services in this state without 299 obtaining a license under this chapter or notifying or 300 registering with the board or paying a fee if, at the time of 301 licensure by such other state or territory, the individual was 302 required to show evidence of having obtained at least a 303 baccalaureate degree and having passed the Uniform CPA 304 Examination: 305 (a)âHolds a valid license as a certified public accountant 306 from a state that the board or its designee has determined by 307 rule to have adopted standards that are substantially equivalent 308 to the certificate requirements in s. 5 of the Uniform 309 Accountancy Act in the issuance of licenses; or 310 (b)âHolds a valid license as a certified public accountant 311 from a state that has not been approved by the board as having 312 adopted standards in substantial equivalence with s. 5 of the 313 Uniform Accountancy Act, but obtains verification from the 314 board, or its designee, as determined by rule, that the 315 individualâs certified public accountant qualifications are 316 substantially equivalent to the certificate requirements in s. 5 317 of the Uniform Accountancy Act. The board shall define by rule 318 what constitutes an office. 319 (3)âAn individual certified public accountant from another 320 state or a territory of the United States who practices pursuant 321 to this section, and the firm that employs that individual, must 322 shall both consent, as a condition of the privilege of 323 practicing in this state: 324 (a)âTo the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and 325 disciplinary authority of the board; 326 (b)âTo comply with this chapter and the applicable board 327 rules; 328 (c)âThat if the individualâs license as a certified public 329 accountant from another the state or a territory of the United 330 States becomes invalid of the individualâs principal place of 331 business is no longer valid, the individual must will cease 332 offering or rendering public accounting services in this state, 333 individually and on behalf of a firm; and 334 (d)âTo the appointment of the state board that issued the 335 individualâs license as the agent upon whom process may be 336 served in any action or proceeding by the board or department 337 against the individual or firm. 338 Section 8.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1), paragraph (d) 339 of subsection (2), and paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of 340 section 473.309, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 341 473.309âPractice requirements for partnerships, 342 corporations, and limited liability companies; business entities 343 practicing public accounting.â 344 (1)âA partnership may not engage in the practice of public 345 accounting, as defined in s. 473.302(8)(a), or meet the 346 requirements of s. 473.3101(1)(b), unless: 347 (c)âAt least one general partner is a certified public 348 accountant of this state and holds an active license or, in the 349 case of a firm that must have a license pursuant to s. 350 473.3101(1)(c), at least one general partner is a certified 351 public accountant in some state and meets the requirements of s. 352 473.3141 s. 473.3141(1)(a) or (b). 353 (2)âA corporation may not engage in the practice of public 354 accounting, as defined in s. 473.302(8)(a), or meet the 355 requirements of s. 473.3101(1)(b), unless: 356 (d)âAt least one shareholder of the corporation is a 357 certified public accountant and holds an active license in this 358 state or, in the case of a firm that must have a license 359 pursuant to s. 473.3101(1)(c), at least one shareholder is a 360 certified public accountant in some state and meets the 361 requirements of s. 473.3141 s. 473.3141(1)(a) or (b). 362 (3)âA limited liability company may not engage in the 363 practice of public accounting, as defined in s. 473.302(8)(a), 364 or meet the requirements of s. 473.3101(1)(b), unless: 365 (c)âAt least one member of the limited liability company is 366 a certified public accountant and holds an active license in 367 this state or, in the case of a firm that must have a license 368 pursuant to s. 473.3101(1)(c), at least one member is a 369 certified public accountant in some state and meets the 370 requirements of s. 473.3141 s. 473.3141(1)(a) or (b). 371 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 372 made by this act to section 473.312, Florida Statutes, in a 373 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 374 473.311, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 375 473.311âRenewal of license.â 376 (1) 377 (b)âA nonresident licensee seeking renewal of a license in 378 this state shall be determined to have met the continuing 379 education requirements in s. 473.312, except for the 380 requirements in s. 473.312(1)(c), if the licensee has complied 381 with the continuing education requirements applicable in the 382 state in which his or her office is located. If the state in 383 which the nonresident licenseeâs office is located has no 384 continuing education requirements for license renewals, the 385 nonresident licensee must comply with the continuing education 386 requirements in s. 473.312. 387 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.